Tennessee, session 114, SB1141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-709, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) If the quarterly analysis of a water sample from a public water system by a
certified laboratory confirms that the level of fluoride in the sample exceeds four-tenths
milligrams per liter (0.4 mg/L), the public water system from which the sample was taken
must:
(1) Obtain laboratory analysis of water samples monthly for fluoride
levels; and
(2) Notify all of its customers that a water sample tested exceeded four-
tenths milligrams per liter (0.4 mg/L) of fluoride in a manner established by the
department.
(b) Once the monthly analysis of water samples for fluoride conducted pursuant
to subdivision (a)(1) confirms that the fluoride level in samples is less than four-tenths
milligrams per liter (0.4 mg/L) for three (3) consecutive months, the public water system
may resume quarterly laboratory analysis for fluoride.
(c) This part does not prohibit naturally occurring fluoride in the water supply;
provided, that fluoride levels do not exceed the maximum levels permitted by federal law
or federal regulations.
SB1141
001072
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-708(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) A public water system fluoridating its water supply on May 1, 2025, shall:
(1) Cease the addition of fluoride or fluoride compounds to the water
supply no later than July 31, 2025; and
(2) Provide written notice to their customers informing them of the
discontinuation of fluoridation and specify the date on which fluoridation will
cease. The notice must be issued thirty (30) days prior to the cessation of
fluoridation.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-711, is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
( ) The addition of fluoride, or a fluoride compound, to the public drinking water
supply by the operator of a water supply system in the state.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect May 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001072